Idaho, session 2025, S1109.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. There is hereby appropriated to Economic Development the
following amounts to be expended according to the designated programs and
expense classes from the listed funds for the period July 1, 2025, through
June 30, 2026:


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
(1) DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE:
I. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE:
A. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $995,700 $812,400 $1,808,100
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 900,900 131,700 1,032,600
Facilities Maintenance
Fund 199,700 173,100 372,800
TOTAL $2,096,300 $1,117,200 $3,213,500
B. ANIMAL INDUSTRIES:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,394,300 $257,600 $2,651,900
Agricultural Inspection
Fund 38,500 9,700 48,200
Agricultural Fees - Livestock Disease Control
Fund 1,052,700 523,300 $20,600 1,596,600
Agricultural Fees - Dairy Inspection
Fund 2,264,600 480,300 20,300 2,765,200
Agricultural Fees - Egg Inspection
Fund 198,300 61,100 259,400
Agricultural Fees - Commercial Fisheries
Fund 5,700 4,200 9,900
Agricultural Fees - Poultry Inspection
Fund 36,000 17,500 53,500
Depredation of Livestock and Prevention
Fund 75,000 $150,000 225,000
Seminars and Publications
Fund 58,300 58,300
Federal Grant
Fund 431,100 117,300 0 48,200 596,600
TOTAL $6,421,200 $1,604,300 $40,900 $198,200 $8,264,600


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
C. AGRICULTURAL RESOURCES:
FROM:
General
Fund $150,800 $127,200 $278,000
Agricultural Fees - Pesticides
Fund 2,732,900 899,600 $23,500 3,656,000
Federal Grant
Fund 484,900 43,400 0 528,300
TOTAL $3,368,600 $1,070,200 $23,500 $4,462,300
D. PLANT INDUSTRIES:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,629,900 $2,018,500 $15,900 $2,516,500 $8,180,800
Agricultural Inspection
Fund 1,607,100 309,200 111,100 2,027,400
Invasive Species
Fund 1,370,300 850,000 100,000 2,320,300
Agricultural Fees - Commercial Feed and Fertilizer
Fund 1,632,800 530,800 2,163,600
Agricultural Fees - Honey Advertising
Fund 400 22,000 22,400
Agricultural Fees - Hemp
Fund 109,500 55,000 164,500
Quality Assurance Laboratory Services
Fund 445,900 137,700 583,600
Federal Grant
Fund 1,340,800 1,098,300 0 946,700 3,385,800
TOTAL $10,136,700 $5,021,500 $15,900 $3,674,300 $18,848,400
E. AGRICULTURAL INSPECTIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $923,200 $226,800 $1,150,000
Weights and Measures Inspection
Fund 560,600 205,700 $8,000 774,300


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Agricultural Fees - Organic Food Products
Fund 681,300 110,000 1,700 793,000
AgriculturalFees- FreshFruitandVegetableInspection
Fund 8,463,000 2,760,300 65,000 11,288,300
TOTAL $10,628,100 $3,302,800 $74,700 $14,005,600
F. MARKET DEVELOPMENT:
FROM:
General
Fund $562,000 $493,100 $1,055,100
Agricultural Inspection
Fund 87,800 74,100 161,900
Seminars and Publications
Fund 245,600 245,600
RuralEconomicDevelopmentIntegratedFreightTransportation
Fund 10,500 20,000 $140,000 170,500
Revolving Loans
Fund 12,300 15,300 27,600
Federal Grant
Fund 281,400 628,100 2,167,500 3,077,000
TOTAL $954,000 $1,476,200 $2,307,500 $4,737,700
G. ANIMAL DAMAGE CONTROL:
FROM:
General
Fund $4,000 $156,700 $160,700
Animal Damage Control
Fund 100,000 100,000
Agricultural Fees - Sheep and Goat Health
Fund 7,200 160,200 167,400
TOTAL $11,200 $416,900 $428,100
H. SHEEP AND GOAT HEALTH BOARD:
FROM:
General
Fund $95,700 $95,700


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Agricultural Fees - Sheep and Goat Health
Fund 72,500 $38,300 110,800
TOTAL $168,200 $38,300 $206,500
DIVISION
TOTAL $33,773,100 $13,641,700 $155,000 $6,596,900 $54,166,700
II. SOIL AND WATER CONSERVATION COMMISSION:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,586,200 $257,400 $5,600 $1,847,800 $3,697,000
Administration and Accounting Services
Fund 30,000 30,000
Resource Conservation and Rangeland Development
Fund 217,200 165,300 200 382,700
Clean Water Revolving Loan (SCC)
Fund 0 30,000 0 0 30,000
TOTAL $1,803,400 $482,700 $5,800 $1,847,800 $4,139,700
DEPARTMENT
TOTAL $35,576,500 $14,124,400 $160,800 $8,444,700 $58,306,400
(2) DEPARTMENT OF COMMERCE:
A. COMMERCE:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,944,200 $1,626,600 $1,250,000 $5,820,800
Idaho Opportunity
Fund 3,000,000 3,000,000
Tourism and Promotion
Fund 1,375,000 14,201,100 12,288,600 27,864,700
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 157,500 157,500
Seminars and Publications
Fund 378,400 378,400
Federal Grant
Fund 475,000 248,300 15,595,800 16,319,100
TOTAL $4,794,200 $16,611,900 $32,134,400 $53,540,500


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
B. BROADBAND OFFICE:
FROM:
General
Fund $227,300 $20,000 $247,300
ARPA Capital Projects
Fund 316,200 316,200
Federal Grant
Fund 316,200 1,675,000 $148,025,000 150,016,200
TOTAL $859,700 $1,695,000 $148,025,000 $150,579,700
DEPARTMENT
TOTAL $5,653,900 $18,306,900 $180,159,400 $204,120,200
(3) DEPARTMENT OF FINANCE:
FROM:
State Regulatory
Fund $8,991,200 $2,141,400 $11,132,600
Mortgage Recovery
Fund 50,000 50,000
Securities Investor Training
Fund 0 50,000 50,000
TOTAL $8,991,200 $2,241,400 $11,232,600
(4) INDUSTRIAL COMMISSION:
A. COMPENSATION:
FROM:
Industrial Administration
Fund $6,587,300 $2,191,500 $1,355,600 $10,134,400
PeaceOfficerandDetentionOfficerTemporaryDisability
Fund 8,800 3,800 156,100 168,700
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 55,000 0 55,000
TOTAL $6,596,100 $2,250,300 $1,511,700 $10,358,100


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
B. REHABILITATION:
FROM:
Industrial Administration
Fund $4,437,700 $1,109,400 $5,547,100
C. CRIME VICTIMS COMPENSATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $294,000 $294,000
Crime Victims Compensation
Fund $1,087,000 $305,400 2,000,000 3,392,400
Federal Grant
Fund 0 0 1,639,000 1,639,000
TOTAL $1,087,000 $305,400 $3,933,000 $5,325,400
DEPARTMENT
TOTAL $12,120,800 $3,665,100 $5,444,700 $21,230,600
(5) DEPARTMENT OF INSURANCE:
A. INSURANCE REGULATION:
FROM:
Insurance Administrative
Fund $6,069,800 $3,064,200 $9,134,000
Federal Grant
Fund 355,100 356,100 $42,000 753,200
TOTAL $6,424,900 $3,420,300 $42,000 $9,887,200
B. STATE FIRE MARSHAL:
FROM:
Arson, Fire and Fraud Prevention
Fund $1,269,400 $375,100 $28,000 $1,672,500
DEPARTMENT
TOTAL $7,694,300 $3,795,400 $70,000 $11,559,700


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
(6) DEPARTMENT OF LABOR:
A. ADMINISTRATIVE SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $59,000 $52,700 $111,700
Unemployment Penalty and Interest
Fund 1,019,900 841,700 1,861,600
Employment Security Special Administration
Fund 100,000 1,784,100 1,884,100
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 496,100 122,100 618,200
Federal Grant
Fund 10,684,700 8,640,600 $75,100 19,400,400
TOTAL $12,359,700 $11,441,200 $75,100 $23,876,000
B. DETERMINATIONS:
FROM:
General
Fund $509,800 $15,800 $525,600
Unemployment Penalty and Interest
Fund 2,779,200 1,184,400 3,963,600
Employment Security Special Administration
Fund 58,600 850,100 908,700
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 617,100 3,785,900 $15,000 4,418,000
Federal Grant
Fund 29,963,600 5,357,200 $794,200 2,409,500 38,524,500
TOTAL $33,928,300 $11,193,400 $794,200 $2,424,500 $48,340,400
C. WORKFORCE AND COMMISSIONS:
FROM:
Unemployment Penalty and Interest
Fund $380,400 $502,000 $176,100 $1,058,500
Employment Security Special Administration
Fund 2,825,600 278,600 3,104,200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 278,500 204,700 483,200
Federal Grant
Fund 13,597,900 2,767,100 0 $11,550,000 27,915,000
TOTAL $17,082,400 $3,752,400 $176,100 $11,550,000 $32,560,900
DEPARTMENT
TOTAL $63,370,400 $26,387,000 $1,045,400 $13,974,500 $104,777,300
(7) PUBLIC UTILITIES COMMISSION:
A. UTILITIES REGULATION:
FROM:
Indirect Cost Recovery
Fund $219,300 $219,300
Public Utilities Commission
Fund $5,184,300 1,672,700 6,857,000
Federal Grant
Fund 313,000 69,200 382,200
TOTAL $5,497,300 $1,961,200 $7,458,500
(8) SELF-GOVERNING AGENCIES:
I. COMMISSION ON HISPANIC AFFAIRS:
FROM:
General
Fund $200,300 $87,900 $288,200
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 77,900 180,300 258,200
TOTAL $278,200 $268,200 $546,400
II. IDAHO STATE HISTORICAL SOCIETY:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,992,500 $1,756,500 $45,800 $31,600 $4,826,400
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 1,359,900 1,589,500 2,949,400
Records Management Service
Fund 219,300 40,500 120,400 380,200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Capitol Commission Operating
Fund 95,400 53,500 148,900
Federal Grant
Fund 1,248,600 982,800 0 130,000 2,361,400
TOTAL $5,915,700 $4,422,800 $166,200 $161,600 $10,666,300
III. IDAHO COMMISSION FOR LIBRARIES:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,428,300 $1,933,300 $567,600 $4,929,200
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 55,000 $5,000 10,000 70,000
Federal Grant
Fund 907,800 908,600 25,000 90,000 1,931,400
TOTAL $3,336,100 $2,896,900 $30,000 $667,600 $6,930,600
IV. STATE LOTTERY:
FROM:
State Lottery
Fund $4,940,500 $3,545,900 $53,400 $8,539,800
V. STATE APPELLATE PUBLIC DEFENDER:
A. OFFICE OF THE STATE APPELLATE PUBLIC DEFENDER:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,529,200 $377,900 $3,907,100
B. CAPITAL AND CONFLICT REPRESENTATION:
FROM:
General
Fund $302,400 $302,400
DIVISION
TOTAL $3,529,200 $680,300 $4,209,500


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
VI. DIVISION OF VETERANS SERVICES:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,483,400 $259,500 $42,400 $1,785,300
Veterans Recognition Income
Fund 1,000,000 195,000 1,195,000
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 21,096,300 8,444,500 29,540,800
Veterans Home Endowment Income
Fund 247,400 660,200 1,500 909,100
Federal Grant
Fund 17,494,900 13,836,300 0 31,331,200
TOTAL $40,322,000 $24,200,500 $238,900 $64,761,400
VII. OFFICE OF THE STATE PUBLIC DEFENDER:
FROM:
General
Fund $2,246,000 $11,416,800 $13,662,800
Public Defense
Fund 37,149,300 0 37,149,300
TOTAL $39,395,300 $11,416,800 $50,812,100
VIII.DIVISIONOFOCCUPATIONALANDPROFESSIONALLICENSES:
A. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
State Regulatory
Fund $50,000 $50,000
B. BUILDING CONSTRUCTION & REAL ESTATE:
FROM:
State Regulatory
Fund $15,427,200 $4,803,300 $26,000 $20,256,500
Miscellaneous Revenue/ Industrial Safety
Fund 837,000 100,600 937,600
Miscellaneous Revenue/ Logging
Fund 493,200 126,000 619,200


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
Federal Grant
Fund 163,600 50,900 0 214,500
TOTAL $16,921,000 $5,080,800 $26,000 $22,027,800
C. OCCUPATIONAL LICENSES:
FROM:
State Regulatory
Fund $3,766,000 $1,321,600 $28,600 $5,116,200
D. HEALTH PROFESSIONS:
FROM:
State Regulatory
Fund $4,947,100 $3,797,600 $500 $8,745,200
DIVISION
TOTAL $25,634,100 $10,250,000 $55,100 $35,939,200
IX. OFFICE OF ADMINISTRATIVE HEARINGS:
FROM:
General
Fund $1,259,800 $367,200 $1,627,000
X. OFFICE OF HEALTH AND SOCIAL SERVICES OMBUDSMAN:
A. OFFICE OF HEALTH & SOCIAL SERVICES OMBUDSMAN:
FROM:
General
Fund $340,100 $125,000 $465,100
XI. COMMISSION OF PARDONS & PAROLE:
FROM:
General
Fund $3,568,000 $768,800 $4,336,800
Miscellaneous Revenue
Fund 0 70,700 70,700
TOTAL $3,568,000 $839,500 $4,407,500
DEPARTMENT
TOTAL $128,519,000 $59,013,100 $249,600 $1,123,200 $188,904,900


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
(9) IDAHO TRANSPORTATION DEPARTMENT:
I. TRANSPORTATION SERVICES:
A. ADMINISTRATION:
FROM:
State Highway
Fund $7,500 $7,500
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund 16,545,200 $17,918,800 34,464,000
State Highway (Federal)
Fund 0 611,100 $300,000 911,100
TOTAL $16,552,700 $18,529,900 $300,000 $35,382,600
B. CAPITAL FACILITIES:
FROM:
State Aeronautics (Dedicated)
Fund $100,000 $100,000
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund $300,000 6,765,000 7,065,000
TOTAL $300,000 $6,865,000 $7,165,000
C. AERONAUTICS:
FROM:
State Aeronautics (Dedicated)
Fund $1,537,300 $868,700 $1,250,000 $3,656,000
State Aeronautics (Federal)
Fund 114,700 573,200 0 687,900
TOTAL $1,652,000 $1,441,900 $1,250,000 $4,343,900
DIVISION
TOTAL $18,204,700 $20,271,800 $6,865,000 $1,550,000 $46,891,500
II. MOTOR VEHICLES:
FROM:
State Highway
Fund $2,400 $2,400


FOR
FOR FOR FOR TRUSTEE AND
PERSONNEL OPERATING CAPITAL BENEFIT
COSTS EXPENDITURES OUTLAY PAYMENTS TOTAL
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund 20,369,500 $14,648,400 $361,700 35,379,600
State Highway (Federal)
Fund 0 3,600,000 0 3,600,000
TOTAL $20,371,900 $18,248,400 $361,700 $38,982,000
III. HIGHWAY OPERATIONS:
FROM:
State Highway
Fund $92,000 $92,000
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund 115,720,000 $68,795,400 $522,000 185,037,400
State Highway (Local)
Fund 307,400 73,900 381,300
State Highway (Federal)
Fund 13,186,600 8,208,400 25,963,600 47,358,600
TOTAL $129,306,000 $77,077,700 $26,485,600 $232,869,300
IV. CONTRACT CONSTRUCTION & RIGHT-OF-WAY ACQUISITION:
FROM:
State Highway (Dedicated)
Fund $2,500,000 $115,447,700 $500,000 $118,447,700
State Highway (Local)
Fund 100,000 6,322,900 100,000 6,522,900
Transportation Expansion and Congestion Mitigation
Fund 22,273,800 22,273,800
State Highway (Federal)
Fund 8,000,000 319,971,600 1,500,000 329,471,600
TOTAL $10,600,000 $464,016,000 $2,100,000 $476,716,000
DEPARTMENT
TOTAL $167,882,600 $126,197,900 $471,242,700 $30,135,600 $795,458,800
GRANDTOTAL $435,306,000 $255,692,400 $472,768,500 $239,282,100 $1,403,049,000
SECTION 2. FTP AUTHORIZATION. In accordance with Section 67-3519,
Idaho Code, each of the programs in Economic Development is authorized no
more than the following number of full-time equivalent positions at any


point during the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026, unless specifi-
cally authorized by the Governor. The Joint Finance-Appropriations Commit-
tee will be notified promptly of any increased positions so authorized.
Department of Agriculture ....................................231.00
Soil and Water Conservation Commission .........................17.75
Department of Commerce ........................................48.00
Department of Finance .........................................72.00
Industrial Commission .......................................130.25
Department of Insurance .......................................75.50
Department of Labor ..........................................659.58
Public Utilities Commission ...................................48.00
Commission on Hispanic Affairs .................................3.00
Idaho State Historical Society ................................59.00
Idaho Commission for Libraries ................................35.50
Idaho State Lottery ...........................................51.00
State Appellate Public Defender ...............................26.00
Division of Veterans Services ................................431.50
Office of the State Public Defender ...........................316.00
Division of Occupational and Professional Licenses ............267.20
Office of Administrative Hearings ..............................9.00
Office of Health and Social Services Ombudsman ...................3.00
Commission of Pardons and Parole ...............................37.00
Idaho Transportation Department ............................1,645.00
SECTION 3. WATERCRAFT INSPECTION PROGRAM. The Department of Agricul-
ture shall maximize the use of the appropriation provided for the watercraft
inspection program to minimize the chances of spreading zebra mussels,
quagga mussels, and other aquatic invasive species into Idaho waters. The
department is encouraged to use roving inspection stations when appropri-
ate and to expand hours of coverage during holidays when boat transport
traffic is likely to increase. It is also encouraged to use extra staffing
on busy holiday weekends. The department shall gather data regarding the
number of watercraft that are bypassing the stations and nighttime trans-
port of watercraft across Idaho's borders. The department shall also seek
to secure federal funding to further enhance invasive species detection
and prevention efforts. The department shall report back to the Joint Fi-
nance-Appropriations Committee, the Senate Agricultural Affairs Committee,
and the House Agricultural Affairs Committee during the 2026 legislative
session regarding the results of the data gathering, attainment of federal
funds, and an operational review of the boat stations.
SECTION 4. CASH TRANSFER TO THE DEPREDATION OF LIVESTOCK AND PREVENTION
FUND. There is hereby appropriated to the Department of Agriculture and the
Office of the State Controller shall transfer $225,000 from the General Fund
to the Depredation of Livestock and Prevention Fund on July 1, 2025, or as
soon thereafter as practicable for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026, to provide for the compensation for depredation of livestock by griz-
zly bear and wolves.


SECTION 5. TRUSTEE AND BENEFIT PAYMENTS DISTRIBUTION. Of the amount ap-
propriated to the Soil and Water Conservation Commission in Section 1 of this
act for trustee and benefit payments, $300,000 shall be distributed equally
among the 50 soil and water conservation districts in addition to the amounts
authorized pursuant to Section 22-2727, Idaho Code.
SECTION 6. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE IDAHO BROADBAND FUND.
There is hereby reappropriated to the Department of Commerce any unexpended
and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to the Department
of Commerce from the Idaho Broadband Fund for fiscal year 2025, not to exceed
$34,825,800, to be used for nonrecurring expenditures for broadband infra-
structure for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office
of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund,
expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to
processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 7. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE ARPA CAPITAL PROJECTS
FUND. There is hereby reappropriated to the Department of Commerce any un-
expended and unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to the
Department of Commerce from the ARPA Capital Projects Fund for fiscal year
2025, not to exceed $107,217,300, to be used for nonrecurring expenditures
for broadband infrastructure for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30,
2026. The Office of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation
amount, by fund, expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services
Office prior to processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 8. REAPPROPRIATION AUTHORITY FOR THE FEDERAL GRANT FUND. There
is hereby reappropriated to the Department of Commerce any unexpended and
unencumbered balances appropriated or reappropriated to the Department of
Commerce from the Federal Grant Fund for fiscal year 2025, not to exceed
$150,000,000, to be used for nonrecurring expenditures for broadband in-
frastructure for the period July 1, 2025, through June 30, 2026. The Office
of the State Controller shall confirm the reappropriation amount, by fund,
expense class, and program, with the Legislative Services Office prior to
processing the reappropriation authorized herein.
SECTION 9. BROADBAND GRANTS. Notwithstanding any law to the contrary,
all moneys appropriated from the ARPA Capital Projects Fund and Federal
Grant Fund to the Department of Commerce for the purpose of broadband grants
shall be allocated at the direction of the Idaho Broadband Advisory Board.
SECTION 10. CONTINUOUS APPROPRIATION AUTHORITY. The Department of Fi-
nance is hereby granted continuous appropriation authority for reimburse-
ment of persons to whom the Idaho Judicial Branch has made a final deter-
mination of actual damages resulting from acts constituting violations of
the Idaho Residential Mortgage Practices Act by a mortgage broker, mortgage
lender, or mortgage loan originator who was licensed or required to be li-
censed pursuant to Chapter 31, Title 26, Idaho Code.


SECTION 11. TELEHEALTH FACILITIES. Of the moneys appropriated in Sec-
tion 1 of this act from the American Rescue Plan Fund to the Commission for
Libraries for library facilities projects, no funds shall be expended for
facility and technology projects that do not comply with Sections 18-608 and
18-617, Idaho Code.
SECTION 12. CONTINUOUS APPROPRIATION. Amounts necessary to pay prizes,
retailer commissions, advertising and promotional costs, and gaming sup-
plier vendor fees based on sales shall be continuously appropriated to the
Idaho State Lottery in accordance with the provisions of Section 67-7428,
Idaho Code.
SECTION 13. EXEMPTIONS FROM PROGRAM TRANSFER LIMITATIONS. The Division
of Occupational and Professional Licenses is hereby exempted from the pro-
visions of Section 67-3511(2), Idaho Code, allowing unlimited transfers be-
tween programs for all moneys appropriated to it for the period July 1, 2025,
through June 30, 2026. Legislative appropriations shall not be transferred
from one fund to another fund unless expressly approved by the Legislature.
SECTION 14. CONTINUOUSLY APPROPRIATED MONEYS. All moneys transferred
to the Local Bridge Inspection Fund and to the Railroad Grade Crossing Pro-
tection Fund, as provided in Section 63-2412, Idaho Code, are hereby contin-
uously appropriated to the Idaho Transportation Department for the stated
purpose of those funds.
SECTION 15. ACCOUNTABILITY REPORTS. Funds specifically identified in
statute or in an appropriation act as intended for a certain purpose may
be used only for that purpose. Funds provided in this act are subject to
accountability reports and management reviews in accordance with Section
67-702, Idaho Code, provided the Legislative Services Office auditor has
sufficient resources to conduct those reports. State agencies that are
authorized to contract for outside audits shall submit those reports to the
Joint Finance-Appropriations Committee when those reports become avail-
able.
SECTION 16. CONDITIONS, LIMITATIONS, AND RESTRICTIONS. Appropriations
made pursuant to this act are subject to the conditions, limitations, and re-
strictions specified in this act.
SECTION 17. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.